Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-835
Prospective payment system; medicaid state plan amendment; development and implementation.

(1) The department shall develop a prospective payment system under the medical assistance program for funding certified community behavioral health clinics. Such system shall permit either daily or monthly payment rates.

(2) The department shall submit to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services any approval request necessary for a medicaid state plan amendment to implement this section.

(3) Subject to such approval, such prospective payment system shall be implemented before January 1, 2026.

(4) The department shall solicit input from current certified community behavioral health clinics during the development of the medicaid state plan amendment.

Laws 2023, LB276, § 5.